Rhode Island, session 2025, SB288.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-2-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-2 entitled "General State
Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-2-1. General officers enumerated — Election and terms.
The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, and general
treasurer shall be known as general officers. They shall be elected at a general election,
quadrennially, in accordance with the provisions of this title, and shall hold their respective offices
for four (4) years beginning on the first Tuesday of January next succeeding their election and until
the election and qualification of their respective successors. No person shall be elected to the same
general office more than twice, and no person who has held a general office for more than two (2)
years of a term to which some other person was elected shall be elected to the same general office
more than once. No person who is ineligible to be elected governor shall be elected lieutenant
governor.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000292
========